Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.090

Advanced paraeducator certificate.

(1) The board shall adopt requirements and policies for an advanced paraeducator certificate that are based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014.

(2) The rules adopted by the board must include the following requirements:

(a) An advanced paraeducator certificate is not a prerequisite for a paraeducator working in any program;

(b) Paraeducators may become eligible for an advanced paraeducator certificate by completing seventy-five hours of professional development in topics related to the duties of an advanced paraeducator; and

(c) Advanced paraeducator certificates expire after five years.

[ 2017 c 237 s 10.]